District of Columbia statutes.
31-3931.20

Judicial review; mandamus.

(a)

Any captive insurer aggrieved by any act, determination, rule, regulation, order, or any other action taken by Commissioner pursuant to this chapter, and which was the subject of a contested case, may appeal to the District of Columbia Court of Appeals, in accordance with § 2-510.

(b)

The filing of an appeal pursuant to this section shall not stay the application of any rule, regulation, order, or other action of the Commissioner to the appealing party unless the court, after giving the appealing party notice and an opportunity to be heard, determines that failure to grant the stay would be detrimental to the interest of policyholders, shareholders, creditors, or the public.

(c)

Any captive insurer aggrieved by any failure of the Commissioner to act or make a determination required by this chapter may petition the Superior Court of the District of Columbia for a writ in the nature of a mandamus or a peremptory mandamus directing the Commissioner to act or make such determination forthwith.

Mar. 17, 2005, D.C. Law 15-262, § 21, 52 DCR 1205
This section is referenced in § 31-3932.03.
For temporary (90 day) addition of section, see § 21 of Captive Insurance Company Emergency Act of 2004 (D.C. Act 15-640, November 30, 2004, 52 DCR 1238).